Nebraska statutes.
Section 1.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201071-4824
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-4824
to 71-4845 shall be known and may be cited as the Revised Uniform Anatomical
Gift Act.

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 1.
January 1, 2011